Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.300

Ground ambulance services organizations—Penalties.

If the insurance commissioner reports to the department that they have cause to believe that a ground ambulance services organization has engaged in a pattern of violations of RCW 48.49.200, and the report is substantiated after investigation, the department may levy a fine upon the ground ambulance services organization in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per violation and take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under the authority of the department.

[ 2024 c 218 s 11.]